Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.035

Contracting out—Board's powers and duties—Goods and services.

(1) The board of directors of a school district may contract with other school districts, educational service districts, public or private organizations, agencies, schools, or individuals to implement the board's powers and duties. The board of directors of a school district may contract for goods and services, including but not limited to contracts for goods and services as specifically authorized in statute or rule, as well as other educational, instructional, and specialized services. When a school district board of directors contracts for educational, instructional, or specialized services, the purpose of the contract must be to improve student learning or achievement.

(2) A contract under subsection (1) of this section may not be made with a religious or sectarian organization or school where the contract would violate the state or federal Constitution.

[ 1997 c 267 s 1.]